vi: Mức độ hoàn chỉnh của bộ chuyển đổi EV: Bộ phụ kiện/bộ lắp đặt (giá đỡ; Bộ pin (pin + BMS/hệ thống giám sát); Bộ sạc (bộ sạc + bộ chuyển đổi/cáp); Bộ hoàn chỉnh (động cơ + bộ điều khiển + pin + bộ sạc + phụ kiện); Bộ điều khiển/biến tần; Bộ hệ thống truyền động (động cơ + bộ điều khiển); công tắc tơ); cầu chì; hệ thống dây điện; Khác
nb: Fullstendighetsnivå for EV-veksling/veksling: Tilbehørs-/monteringssett (fester; Batterisett (batteri + BMS/overvåking); Ladesett (lader + adaptere/kabler); Komplett sett (motor + styreenhet + batteri + lader + tilbehør); Styreenhet-/omformersett; Drivverkssett (motor + styreenhet); kontaktorer); sikringer; kabling; Annet
zh-CN: EV 改装套件完整性级别: 配件/安装套件（支架; 电池套件（电池 + BMS/监控系统）; 充电套件（充电器 + 适配器/线缆）; 完整套件（电机 + 控制器 + 电池 + 充电器 + 配件）; 控制器/逆变器套件; 动力传动系统套件（电机 + 控制器）; 接触器）; 保险丝; 接线; 其他
tr: EV dönüşüm kit tamamlanma düzeyi: Aksesuar/kurulum kiti (montaj parçaları; Batarya kiti (batarya + BMS/izleme); Şarj kiti (şarj cihazı + adaptörler/kablolar); Tam kit (motor + kontrol cihazı + batarya + şarj cihazı + aksesuarlar); Kontrol cihazı/invertör kiti; Güç aktarma organı kiti (motor + kontrol cihazı); kontaktörler); sigortalar; kablolama; Diğer
zh-TW: 電動車改裝套件完整度等級: 配件/安裝套件 (支架; 電池套件 (電池 + BMS/監控); 充電套件 (充電器 + 轉接器/連接線); 完整套件 (馬達 + 控制器 + 電池 + 充電器 + 配件); 控制器/變流器套件; 傳動系統套件 (馬達 + 控制器); 接觸器); 保險絲; 配線; 其他
en: EV conversion kit completeness level: Accessory/installation kit (mounts; Battery kit (battery + BMS/monitoring); Charging kit (charger + adapters/cables); Complete kit (motor + controller + battery + charger + accessories); Controller/inverter kit; Drivetrain kit (motor + controller); contactors); fuses; wiring; Other
ro-RO: Gradul de completitudine al kitului de conversie la VE: Kit de accesorii/instalare (suporturi; Kit baterie (baterie + BMS/monitorizare); Kit de încărcare (încărcător + adaptoare/cabluri); Kit complet (motor + controller + baterie + încărcător + accesorii); Kit controller/invertor; Kit transmisie (motor + controller); contactoare); siguranțe; cablaj; Altele
lt-LT: EV konversijos rinkinio komplektiškumo lygis: Priedų / montavimo rinkinys (laikikliai,; Akumuliatoriaus rinkinys (akumuliatorius + BMS / stebėjimas); Įkrovimo rinkinys (įkroviklis + adapteriai / kabeliai); Pilnas rinkinys (variklis + valdiklis + akumuliatorius + įkroviklis + priedai); Valdiklio / keitiklio rinkinys; Pavaros rinkinys (variklis + valdiklis); kontaktoriai); saugikliai; laidai; Kita
fi: Sähköajoneuvon muunnossarjan taso: Lisävaruste-/asennussarja (kiinnikkeet; Akkusarja (akku + BMS/valvonta); Lataussarja (laturi + sovittimet/kaapelit); Täydellinen sarja (moottori + ohjain + akku + laturi + lisävarusteet); Ohjain-/invertterisarja; Voimansiirtosarja (moottori + ohjain); kontaktorit); sulakkeet; johdotus; Muu
nl: Elektrisch voertuig ombouwset volledigheidsniveau: Accessoire-/installatiekit (bevestigingen; Batterijkit (batterij + BMS/monitoring); Laadkit (oplader + adapters/kabels); Complete kit (motor + controller + batterij + oplader + accessoires); Controller-/omvormerkit; Aandrijflijnkit (motor + controller); contactoren); zekeringen; bedrading; Overig
ru: Уровень комплектности набора для переоборудования в электромобиль: Набор аксессуаров/для установки (крепления; Набор аккумулятора (аккумулятор + BMS/мониторинг); Набор для зарядки (зарядное устройство + адаптеры/кабели); Полный набор (двигатель + контроллер + аккумулятор + зарядное устройство + аксессуары); Набор контроллера/инвертора; Набор трансмиссии (двигатель + контроллер); контакторы); предохранители; проводка; Другое
ko: EV 전환 키트 완성도 수준: 액세서리/설치 키트(마운트; 배터리 키트(배터리 + BMS/모니터링); 충전 키트(충전기 + 어댑터/케이블); 완성 키트(모터 + 컨트롤러 + 배터리 + 충전기 + 액세서리); 컨트롤러/인버터 키트; 드라이브트레인 키트(모터 + 컨트롤러); 접촉기); 퓨즈; 배선; 기타
sv: Fullständighetsnivå för EV-konverteringssats: Tillbehörs-/installationskit (fästen; Batterikit (batteri + BMS/övervakning); Laddningskit (laddare + adaptrar/kablar); Komplett kit (motor + controller + batteri + laddare + tillbehör); Controller-/inverterkit; Drivlinekit (motor + controller); kontaktorer); säkringar; kablage; Övrigt
bg-BG: Ниво на комплектност на комплект за конверсия към електрическо задвижване на ЕПС: Комплект аксесоари/за инсталиране (стойки; Комплект батерии (батерия + BMS/мониторинг); Комплект за зареждане (зарядно + адаптери/кабели); Пълен комплект (двигател + контролер + батерия + зарядно + аксесоари); Комплект контролер/инвертор; Комплект задвижване (двигател + контролер); контактори); предпазители; окабеляване; Други
el: Επίπεδο πληρότητας κιτ μετατροπής EV: Κιτ αξεσουάρ/εγκατάστασης (βάσεις; Κιτ μπαταρίας (μπαταρία + BMS/παρακολούθηση); Κιτ φόρτισης (φορτιστής + προσαρμογείς/καλώδια); Πλήρες κιτ (κινητήρας + ελεγκτής + μπαταρία + φορτιστής + αξεσουάρ); Κιτ ελεγκτή/μετατροπέα; Κιτ συστήματος μετάδοσης (κινητήρας + ελεγκτής); επαφείς); ασφάλειες; καλωδίωση; Άλλο
de: Vollständigkeitsgrad des EV-Umrüstkits: Zubehör-/Installationspaket (Halterungen; Batteriepaket (Batterie + BMS/Überwachung); Ladepaket (Ladegerät + Adapter/Kabel); Komplettpaket (Motor + Controller + Batterie + Ladegerät + Zubehör); Controller-/Wechselrichter-Paket; Antriebspaket (Motor + Controller); Schütze); Sicherungen; Verkabelung; Sonstige
hr-HR: Razina dovršenosti kompleta za EV konverziju: Komplet pribora / za ugradnju (nosači; Komplet baterija (baterija + BMS / nadzor); Komplet za punjenje (punjač + adapteri/kabeli); Potpuni komplet (motor + upravljač + baterija + punjač + dodaci); Komplet upravljača/izmjenjivača; Komplet pogonskog sklopa (motor + upravljač); sklopnici); osigurači; ožičenje; Ostalo
es: Nivel de completitud del kit de conversión de vehículos eléctricos: Kit de accesorios/instalación (soportes; Kit de batería (batería + BMS/monitoreo); Kit de carga (cargador + adaptadores/cables); Kit completo (motor + controlador + batería + cargador + accesorios); Kit de controlador/inversor; Kit de transmisión (motor + controlador); contactores); fusibles; cableado; Otro
sk-SK: Úroveň kompletnosti súpravy na konverziu na elektrický pohon: Súprava príslušenstva/inštalačná súprava (držiaky; Súprava batérie (batéria + BMS/monitorovanie); Súprava nabíjania (nabíjačka + adaptéry/káble); Kompletná súprava (motor + ovládač + batéria + nabíjačka + príslušenstvo); Súprava ovládača/meniča; Súprava hnacieho ústrojenstva (motor + ovládač); stýkače); poistky; kabeláž; Iné
fr: Niveau de complétude du kit de conversion pour véhicule électrique: Kit d’accessoires/d’installation (supports; Kit de batterie (batterie + BMS/surveillance); Kit de charge (chargeur + adaptateurs/câbles); Kit complet (moteur + contrôleur + batterie + chargeur + accessoires); Kit contrôleur/onduleur; Kit de transmission (moteur + contrôleur); contacteurs); fusibles; câblage; Autre
sl-SI: Stopnja celovitosti kompleta za predelavo v električno vozilo: Komplet dodatne opreme/za namestitev (nosilci; Komplet baterije (baterija + BMS/nadzor); Komplet za polnjenje (polnilnik + adapterji/kabli); Popoln komplet (motor + krmilnik + baterija + polnilnik + dodatna oprema); Komplet krmilnika/razsmernika; Komplet pogonskega sklopa (motor + krmilnik); kontaktorji); varovalke; ožičenje; Drugo
th: ระดับความครบถ้วนของชุดแปลงเป็นรถไฟฟ้า: ชุดอุปกรณ์เสริม/สำหรับติดตั้ง (แท่นยึด; ชุดแบตเตอรี่ (แบตเตอรี่ + BMS/การตรวจสอบ); ชุดการชาร์จ (เครื่องชาร์จ + อะแดปเตอร์/สายเคเบิล); ชุดครบวงจร (มอเตอร์ + ตัวควบคุม + แบตเตอรี่ + เครื่องชาร์จ + อุปกรณ์เสริม); ชุดตัวควบคุม/อินเวอร์เตอร์; ชุดระบบขับเคลื่อน (มอเตอร์ + ตัวควบคุม); คอนแทกเตอร์); ฟิวส์; สายไฟ; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Nível de completude do kit de conversão para veículos elétricos: Kit de instalação/acessórios (suportes; Kit de bateria (bateria + BMS/monitorização); Kit de carregamento (carregador + adaptadores/cabos); Kit completo (motor + controlador + bateria + carregador + acessórios); Kit de controlador/inversor; Kit de transmissão (motor + controlador); contactores); fusíveis; cablagem; Outro
ja: EVコンバージョンキットの完成レベル: アクセサリー/設置キット (マウント; バッテリーキット (バッテリー + BMS/モニタリング); 充電キット (充電器 + アダプター/ケーブル); コンプリートキット (モーター + コントローラー + バッテリー + 充電器 + アクセサリー); コントローラー/インバーターキット; ドライブトレインキット (モーター + コントローラー); コンタクター); ヒューズ; 配線; その他
da: Hvor komplet konverteringssættet er: Tilbehørs-/installationssæt (beslag; Batterisæt (batteri + BMS/overvågning); Opladningssæt (oplader + adaptere/kabler); Komplet sæt (motor + styreenhed + batteri + oplader + tilbehør); Sæt med styreenhed/inverter; Drivlinjesæt (motor + styreenhed); kontaktorer); sikringer; kabler; Andet
cs: Úroveň kompletnosti sady pro přestavbu na elektromobil: Sada příslušenství/instalace (držáky; Sada baterie (baterie + BMS/monitorování); Sada nabíjení (nabíječka + adaptéry/kabely); Kompletní sada (motor + řídicí jednotka + baterie + nabíječka + příslušenství); Sada řídicí jednotky / měniče; Sada hnacího ústrojí (motor + řídicí jednotka); stykače); pojistky; kabeláž; Jiné
pl: Poziom kompletności zestawu konwersja EV: Zestaw akcesoriów/montażowy (mocowania; Zestaw akumulatora (akumulator + BMS/monitorowanie); Zestaw do ładowania (ładowarka + adaptery/kable); Kompletny zestaw (silnik + sterownik + akumulator + ładowarka + akcesoria); Zestaw ze sterownikiem/falownikiem; Zestaw układu napędowego (silnik + sterownik); styczniki); bezpieczniki; okablowanie; Inne
it: livello di completezza del kit di conversione EV: Kit di accessori/installazione (supporti; Kit batteria (batteria + BMS/monitoraggio); Kit di ricarica (caricabatterie + adattatori/cavi); Kit completo (motore + controller + batteria + caricabatterie + accessori); Kit controller/inverter; Kit gruppo propulsore (motore + controller); contattori); fusibili; cablaggio; Altro
hu: Elektromos jármű átalakító készlet teljességi szintje: Tartozék-/szerelőkészlet (tartók; Akkumulátorkészlet (akkumulátor + BMS/felügyelet); Töltőkészlet (töltő + adapterek/kábelek); Teljes készlet (motor + vezérlő + akkumulátor + töltő + tartozékok); Vezérlő/inverter készlet; Hajtáslánckészlet (motor + vezérlő); kontaktorok); biztosítékok; kábelezés; Egyéb
pt-BR: Nível de completude do kit de conversão para veículo elétrico: Kit de acessórios/instalação (suportes; Kit de bateria (bateria + BMS/monitoramento); Kit de carregamento (carregador + adaptadores/cabos); Kit completo (motor + controlador + bateria + carregador + acessórios); Kit de controlador/inversor; Kit de transmissão (motor + controlador); contatores); fusíveis; fiação; Outro